Oklahoma, session 2026, SB506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-139, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 5-139. School districts shall make payroll deductions


for either or both professional organization dues and political


contributions at the written request of any school employee subject


to the provisions of Section 2 of this act and shall transmit

Req. No. 1293 Page 1


deducted funds to the organization designated by the school district


employee. Such deductions shall be on a ten-month basis unless


otherwise designated by the employee organization but shall not


exceed one (1) year without reauthorization. However, a school


employee may request at any time in writing, including by email or


fax, for the school district to immediately terminate or initiate


payroll deductions to a professional organization. Upon receipt of


any written request, the school district shall within five (5)


business days or by the next pay period, whichever is earlier,


terminate or initiate any future payroll deductions of the


requesting school employee to a professional organization. Upon


receipt of a written request, the school district shall notify the


professional organization of the initiation or termination of


payroll deductions within fifteen (15) business days. If the


request is to terminate a deduction, the school district shall not


make any advance payments to any professional organization of any


future dues on behalf of the school employee, and no further debt


from the school employee to the professional organization shall


accrue. No school district policy or negotiated agreement shall


place any other conditions or requirements, including but not


limited to personal hand delivery, upon any employee to initiate or


terminate any payroll deduction to a professional organization


except for a written request as outlined in this section. Any


school district policy or provision in a negotiated agreement that

Req. No. 1293 Page 2


places additional conditions or requirements on initiation or


termination beyond those outlined in this section shall be null and


void. A school district which fails to terminate payroll deductions


for an employee in accordance with this section shall immediately


reimburse the employee the amount of all payroll deductions made by


the school district after the employee’s request, and the amount due


the employee shall double every thirty (30) days until paid in full.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-139a of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Authorization for professional organization dues and


political contributions as provided for in Section 5-139 of Title 70


of the Oklahoma Statutes shall be on a form prescribed by the


Secretary of Education and contain a statement in fourteen-point


boldface font reading:


“I am aware that I have a First Amendment right, as recognized


by the U.S. Supreme Court, to refrain from joining and paying dues


or making political contributions to a professional employee


organization. I further realize that membership and payment of dues


or political contributions are voluntary and that I may not be


discriminated against for my refusal to join or financially support


a professional employee organization. I hereby authorize my


employer to deduct dues and/or political contributions from my


salary in the amounts specified in accordance with my professional

Req. No. 1293 Page 3


employee organization’s bylaws. I understand that I may revoke this


authorization at any time.”


B. Authorization containing an employee’s full name, position,


professional organization, and signature shall be submitted to the


school district. The school district shall confirm the


authorization by emailing the employee’s school district-provided


email address and shall wait for confirmation of the authorization


before starting any deduction. If the employee does not possess a


school district-provided email address, the school district may use


other means it deems appropriate to confirm the authorization.


C. An authorization shall expire at the start of the first full


pay period each school year unless it was authorized or reauthorized


during the previous school year.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1293 EB 1/19/2025 5:37:42 AM











Req. No. 1293 Page 4